Idaho, session 2026, H0950.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Legislature $200,000 from the General
Fund to be expended for operating expenditures for the period July 1, 2025,
through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 2. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY. There is hereby reappropriated
to the Legislature any unexpended and unencumbered balances appropriated
or reappropriated to the Legislature from the General Fund for fiscal year
2026, to be used for nonrecurring expenditures for the period July 1, 2026,
through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 1 of this act shall be in full force and effect
on and after passage and approval, and Section 2 of this act shall be in full
force and effect on and after July 1, 2026.